src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V26_odd

+V+Inf:%>уӈкве K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>е̄гум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>е̄гын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>и K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>име̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>егы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>е̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>е̄в K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>егы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>е̄гыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>илум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>илын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>итэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>иламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>илы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>итэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>илув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>илы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ия̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>иягум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>иягын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ияге K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>иягме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>иягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ияге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>иягув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>иягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ияга̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>иянум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>иян K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>иянэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>иянме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ияны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>иянэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>иянув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ияны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ия̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ияна̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>исум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>исын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ис K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>исаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>исы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>исы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>исӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>исы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>исыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ислум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ислын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>истэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>исламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ислы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>истэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ислув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ислы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>иса̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>исагум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>исагын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>исаге K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>исагме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>исагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>исаге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>исагув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>исагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>иса̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>исаганыл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>исанум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>исан K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>исанэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>исанме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>исаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>исанэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>исанув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>исаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>исаныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>асум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>асын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ас K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>асаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>асы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>асы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>асӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>асы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>асыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>аслум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>аслын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>астэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>асламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>аслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>астэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>аслув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>аслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>аса̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>асагум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>асагын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>асаге K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>асагме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>асагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>асаге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>асагув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>асагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>аса̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>асаганыл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>асанум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>асан K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>асанэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>асанме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>асаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>асанэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>асанув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>асаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>асаныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>нӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>нӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>нув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>нуваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>нувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>нувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>нувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>нувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>нӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>нӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>нӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>нӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>нувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>нувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>нувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>нувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>нувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>нува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>нува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>нува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>нува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>нувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>нувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>нуваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>нувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>нувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>нувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>нува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>нува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>нува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>нуванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>нуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>нуванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>нуванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>нуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>нува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>инӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>инӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>инув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>инуваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>инувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>инувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>инувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>инувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>инӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>инӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>инӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>инӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>инувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>инувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>инувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>инувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>инувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>инува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>инува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>инува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>инува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>инувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>инувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>инуваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>инувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>инувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>инувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>инува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>инува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>инува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>инуванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>инуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>инуванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>инуванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>инуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>инува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>анӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>анӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>анув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>ануваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>анувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>анувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>анувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>анувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>анӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>анӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>анӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>анӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>анувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>анувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>анувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>анувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>анувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>анува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>анува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>анува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>анува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>анувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>анувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ануваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>анувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>анувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>анувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>анува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>анува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>анува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ануванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ануваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ануванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ануванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ануваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>анува̄ныл K ;

+V+Imp+ScSg2:%>ен K ;
+V+Imp+ScDu2:%>е̄н K ;
+V+Imp+ScPl2:%>е̄н K ;

+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>елн K ;
+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>елн K ;
