src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
акван-юрщуӈкве:акван-юрщ V26_odd "объединить" ;
а̄мщуӈкве:а̄мщ V26_odd "загадывать загадки" ;
ёл-тумщуӈкве:ёл-тумщ V26_odd "плескаться" ;
пе̄рщуӈкве:пе̄рщ V26_odd "побороться" ;
ра̄пщуӈкве:ра̄пщ V26_odd "моргать" ;
тумщуӈкве:тумщ V26_odd "всплескивать " ;
ха̄рщуӈкве:ха̄рщ V26_odd "трещать//хрустеть" ;
